Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.475

Exchange of information with law enforcement and juvenile court officials—Notification of parents and students.

School districts may participate in the exchange of information with law enforcement and juvenile court officials to the extent permitted by the family educational and privacy rights act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g. When directed by court order or pursuant to any lawfully issued subpoena, a school district shall make student records and information available to law enforcement officials, probation officers, court personnel, and others legally entitled to the information. Except as provided in RCW 13.40.480, parents and students shall be notified by the school district of all such orders or subpoenas in advance of compliance with them.

[ 1998 c 269 s 11; 1992 c 205 s 120.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—Effective date—1998 c 269: See notes following RCW 72.05.020.

Part headings not law—Severability—1992 c 205: See notes following RCW 13.40.010.